Montana, session 2025, HB133.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Mandatory reporting of hunting activity -- rulemaking. (1) A person
who purchases a hunting license for a game animal as defined in 87-2-101 shall report to the department their
hunting activity for each animal.
(2) A person shall report their hunting activity for a game animal before they are eligible to
purchase a new game animal license during the following license year.
(3) The department may make rules to implement this section, including but not limited to reporting
systems, deadlines, and penalties.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an
integral part of Title 87, chapter 2, part 1, and the provisions of Title 87, chapter 2, part 1, apply to [section 1].

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Effective date. [This act] is effective March 1, 2026.
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 133